District of Columbia statutes.
7-1651.02

Human papillomavirus public education campaign.

By January 1, 2008, the Mayor shall initiate a public information campaign, including multiple HPV vaccine education forums in each ward, aimed at educating the public on:

(1)

The connection between HPV and cervical cancer;

(2)

The importance of protecting oneself against HPV infection;

(3)

The value of screening for cervical cancer through regular pap tests; and

(4)

The effectiveness and risks of the HPV vaccine.

July 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-10, § 3, 54 DCR 5146